District of Columbia statutes.
47-1814.06

Repealed

Persons engaging in a profession — Failure to obtain.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 358, ch. 258, art. I, title XIV, § 7
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 80, ch. 154, § 18
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 179, Pub. L. 91-106, § 604(b)(2)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 103(e), 39 DCR 4895
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(b), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1814.6.
1973 Ed., § 47-1591f.